Utah statutes.
73-18-20.3.   Falsified hull identification, engine, or motor number.
(1)  A person is guilty of a third degree felony if he:
(a)  with fraudulent intent defaces, destroys, or alters a vessel hull
identification number or serial number for an engine or outboard motor;
(b)  places or stamps any vessel hull identification number upon a vessel or
serial number upon an engine or outboard motor, except one assigned by the
division or its authorized agent;
(c)  knowingly buys, receives, disposes of, sells, offers for sale, or has in
his possession any vessel, or engine or outboard motor removed from a vessel,
from which the vessel hull identification number or engine or outboard motor
serial number, has been removed, defaced, covered, altered, or destroyed for
the purpose of concealing or misrepresenting the identity of the vessel,
engine, or outboard motor;
(d)  with intent to procure or pass title to a vessel or outboard motor,
receives or transfers possession of a vessel or outboard motor which he knows
or has reason to believe has been stolen or unlawfully taken; or
(e)  has in his possession a vessel or outboard motor which he knows or has
reason to believe has been stolen or unlawfully taken, unless the person is a
peace officer engaged at the time in the performance of his duty.
(2) (a)  This section does not prohibit the restoration by an owner of an
original vessel hull identification number or manufacturer's serial number for
an engine or outboard motor if the restoration is made by application to the
division or its authorized agent.
(b)  This section does not prohibit any manufacturer from placing, in the
ordinary course of business, numbers or marks upon vessels, motors, outboard
motors, or parts.
